Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.080

Salaries of judges—Payment of court operating costs from city funds—Judges and employees as city employees.

Salaries of municipal court judges shall be fixed by ordinance. All costs of operating the municipal court, including but not limited to salaries of judges and court employees, dockets, books of records, forms, furnishings, and supplies, shall be paid wholly out of the funds of the city or town. The city shall provide a suitable place for holding court and pay all expenses of maintaining it.

All employees of the municipal court shall, for all purposes, be deemed employees of the city or town. They shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the court.

[ 1984 c 258 s 111; 1961 c 299 s 57.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.

Salaries of municipal judges in cities over 400,000: RCW 3.58.010 and 35.20.160.